Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4337
Bonds; risk management pool property; tax exempt.

(1) All bonds of a risk management pool are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

(2) The property of a risk management pool, including any pro rata share of any property owned by a risk management pool in conjunction with any other person, is declared to be public property of a public agency used for essential public and governmental purposes. Such property and the income of a risk management pool shall be exempt from all taxes of the state or any member of a risk management pool or other public agency and shall be exempt from all special assessments of any participating member of a risk management pool.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 37.